Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-1704
CFTC rule, defined.

CFTC rule shall mean any rule, regulation, or order of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission in effect on January 1, 2025.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 283, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB76, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB259, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 16;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 15;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 23;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 16.